Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska73-203
Contingent fee contract; executed by state; void; exception.

Any contingent fee contract of any kind whatsoever reasonably anticipated to result in the payment of a contingent fee or fees in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars per annum executed by the state or by any person on behalf of the state after September 9, 1995, is void unless executed by the Governor upon thirty days' notice to the public at large.

Laws 1995, LB 519, § 2.